tr: Şasi yapım tipi: Monokok; Uzay kafes; Boru şasi; Diğer
fi: Alustan rakennetyyppi: Itsekantava kori; Putkirunko; Putkirunko; Muu
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie podvozku: Monokok; Priestorový rám; Rúrkový rám; Iné
ru: Тип конструкции шасси: Монокок; Пространственная рама; Трубчатая рама; Другое
es: Tipo de construcción de chasis: Monocasco; Estructura espacial; Estructura tubular; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de construcție al șasiului: Monococă; Cadru spațial; Cadru tubular; Altele
da: Chassiskonstruktionstype: Monocoque; Spaceframe; Rørramme; Andet
pl: Typ konstrukcji podwozia: Monocoque (samonośna); Rama przestrzenna; Rama rurowa; Inna
it: Tipo di costruzione del telaio: Monoscocca; Telaio spaziale a tubi; Telaio tubolare; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do chassis: Monocoque; Chassi tubular; Estrutura tubular; Outro
zh-CN: 底盘结构类型: 单体壳; 空间管阵式车架; 钢管车架; 其他
vi: Kiểu cấu trúc khung gầm: Khung liền khối; Khung lưới không gian; Khung ống; Khác
hu: Alvázkonstrukció típusa: Önhordó karosszéria; Térvázas; Csővázas; Egyéb
ja: シャーシ構造タイプ: モノコック; スペースフレーム; チューブラーフレーム; その他
de: Chassiskonstruktionstyp: Monocoque; Spaceframe; Rohrrahmen; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Vrsta izrade kućišta: Monocoque; Prostorni okvir; Cjevasti okvir; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de construção do chassi: Monobloco; Estrutura espacial; Estrutura tubular; Outro
nl: Type chassisconstructie: Zelfdragend; Vakwerkframe; Buizenframe; Overig
cs: Typ konstrukce podvozku: Skořepinová; Prostorový rám; Trubkový rám; Jiná
lt-LT: Važiuoklės konstrukcijos tipas: Monokokas; Erdvinis rėmas; Vamzdinis rėmas; Kita
zh-TW: 底盤結構類型: 單體式; 空間桁架式; 管狀車架; 其他
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на шасито: Монокок; Пространствена рама; Тръбна рама; Други
sv: Typ av chassikonstruktion: Monocoque; Fackverksram; Rörram; Övrigt
el: Τύπος κατασκευής αμαξώματος: Αυτοφερόμενο; Χωροδικτύωμα; Σωληνωτό πλαίσιο; Άλλο
nb: Konstruksjonstype i chassis: Monocoque; Romfagverk; Rørramme; Annet
ko: 섀시 구조 유형: 모노코크; 스페이스 프레임; 튜블러 프레임; 기타
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างแชสซี: โมโนค็อก; สเปซเฟรม; เฟรมท่อ; อื่นๆ
en: Chassis construction type: Monocoque; Spaceframe; Tubular frame; Other
fr: Type de construction du châssis: Monocoque; Châssis treillis; Châssis tubulaire; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta konstrukcije šasije: Monokok; Prostorski okvir; Cevni okvir; Drugo